Hawaii statutes.
§268-1.5 Private ferry or ferry
system; authority to provide. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
chapter, the department, in lieu of establishing the Hawaii State Ferries, an
inter-island or intra-island ferry or ferry system operated and maintained by
the State under the provisions of the chapter, may enter into a contract,
lease, or other agreement with any person to provide for a privately operated
ferry or ferry system; provided that no contract, lease, or other agreement
shall be made except under contract let after public advertisement for sealed
tenders, subject to the provisions under chapter 103D. [L 1988, c 232, §2; am L
Sp 1993, c 8, §54]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next